Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Article III Regulation of Manufacturing, Distributing, Prescribing, Administering, and Dispensing Controlled Substances
21-28-3.32.
Electronic prescription database. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

The information contained in any prescription-drug-monitoring database maintained by the department of health pursuant to §

21-28-3.18

shall be disclosed only:

To a practitioner who certifies that the requested information is for the purpose of evaluating the need for, or providing medical treatment to, a current patient to whom the practitioner is prescribing or considering prescribing a controlled substance;

To a pharmacist who certifies that the requested information is for a current client to whom the pharmacist is dispensing, or considering dispensing, a controlled substance;

To an authorized designee of the practitioner and/or pharmacist to consult the prescription-drug-monitoring database on the practitioner’s and/or pharmacist’s behalf, or to a medical director of the practitioner’s practice for quality improvement activities within the practice, provided that:

The designee so authorized is employed by the same professional practice or pharmacy;

The practitioner or pharmacist takes reasonable steps to ensure that the designee is sufficiently competent in the use of the database;

The practitioner or pharmacist remains responsible for ensuring that access to the database by the designee is limited to authorized purposes as provided for in subsections (a)(1) and (a)(2);

The practitioner or pharmacist remains responsible for ensuring access to the database by the designee occurs in a manner that protects the confidentiality of information obtained from the database and remains responsible for any breach of confidentiality;

The practitioner or pharmacist terminates the designee’s access to the database at the termination of the designee’s employment; and

The ultimate decision as to whether or not to prescribe or dispense a controlled substance remains with the practitioner or pharmacist and is reasonably informed by the relevant, controlled substance history information obtained from the database;

Pursuant to a valid search warrant based on probable cause to believe a violation of federal or state criminal law has occurred and that specified information contained in the database would assist in the investigation of the crime;

To a patient who requests his or her own prescription information, or the parent or legal guardian of a minor child who requests the minor child’s prescription information;

To a health professional regulatory board that documents, in writing, that the requested information is necessary for an investigation related to licensure, renewal, or disciplinary action involving the applicant, licensee, or registrant to whom the requested information pertains;

To any vendor or contractor with whom the department has contracted, pursuant to state purchasing law and regulations in the contracting of vendors, to establish or maintain the electronic system of the prescription-drug-monitoring database;

To public or private entities for statistical, research, or educational purposes, after removing the patient and prescriber information that could be used to identify individual patients. This shall not include entities receiving a waiver from the institutional review board; or

To any vendor, agent, contractor, or designee who operates an electronic health record or clinical-management system for the purpose of sharing data with practitioners, pharmacists, or licensed healthcare facilities or designees.

Information stored in the prescription-drug-monitoring database shall include only the following:

Patient’s first and last name and/or patient identification number; provided, however, the patient’s social security number shall not be recorded in whole or in part, patient sex, patient date of birth, and patient address;

Prescribing practitioner’s name and Drug Enforcement Administration prescriber-information number;

Prescribing practitioner’s office or hospital contact information;

Prescription name, prescription number, prescription species code, national drug code number, prescription dosage, prescription quantity, days’ supply, new-refill code, number of refills authorized, date the prescription was written, date the prescription was filled, payment type; provided, however, no credit card number shall be recorded in whole or in part; and

The Drug Enforcement Administration pharmacy number of the pharmacy filling the prescription.

The department shall disclose any information relating to a patient maintained in the prescription-drug-monitoring database to that patient, at no cost to the patient, within thirty (30) business days after the department receives a written request from the patient for the information. This information shall include the records maintained by the department pursuant to subsection (e). Notwithstanding the above, the department may, at the request of the law enforcement agency, withhold, for up to sixty (60) days following the conclusion of a law enforcement investigation, the disclosure to the patient that information has been obtained pursuant to subdivision (a)(4).

A patient may request, from the dispensing pharmacy, correction of any inaccurate information contained within the prescription-drug-monitoring database in accordance with the procedure specified by §

5-37.3-5(c)

.

The department shall, for the period of time that prescription information is maintained, maintain records of the information disclosed through the prescription-drug-monitoring database, including, but not limited to:

The identity of each person who requests or receives information from the prescription-drug-monitoring database and the organization, if any, the person represents;

The information released to each person or organization and the basis for its release under subsection (a); and

The dates the information was requested and provided.

Prescription information contained within the prescription-drug-monitoring database shall be removed no later than five (5) years from the date the information is entered into the database. Records in existence prior to the enactment of this section shall be removed no later than ten (10) years from the date the information is entered into the database.

The department shall promptly notify any affected individual of an improper disclosure of information from the prescription-drug-monitoring database or a breach in the security of the prescription-drug-monitoring database that poses a significant risk of disclosure of patient information to an unauthorized individual.

At the time of signing a prescription that is required by the department to be entered into the prescription-drug-monitoring database, the prescribing practitioner shall inform the patient in writing of the existence of the prescription-drug-monitoring database; the patient’s right to access his or her own prescription information; and the name and contact information of the agency operating the program.

No person shall access information in the prescription-monitoring database except to the extent and for the purposes authorized by subsection (a).

In any civil action allowing a violation of this chapter, the court may award damages, including punitive damages, and reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs to a prevailing plaintiff, and injunctive and any other appropriate relief.

Any pharmacist who, in his or her professional judgment, refuses to fill a prescription based on information contained within the prescription-drug-monitoring database shall inform the prescribing physician within twenty-four (24) hours.

All practitioners shall, as a condition of the initial registration or renewal of the practitioner’s authority to prescribe controlled substances, register with the prescription-drug-monitoring database maintained by the department of health.

The prescription-monitoring program shall be reviewed prior to starting any opioid. A prescribing practitioner, or designee as authorized by subsection (a)(3) of this section, shall review the prescription-monitoring program prior to refilling or initiating opioid therapy with an intrathecal pump. For patients the prescribing practitioner is maintaining on continuous opioid therapy for pain for three (3) months or longer, the prescribing practitioner shall review information from the prescription-monitoring program at least every three (3) months. Documentation of that review shall be noted in the patient’s medical record.

The department shall improve the usefulness and value of the prescription-drug-monitoring database program by increasing its analytical functionality, timeliness, and scope, such as by:

Utilizing data from additional data sources as permissible under state and federal statutes;

Analyzing information submitted to the prescription-drug-monitoring database to ensure that prescription data collected from dispensing pharmacists is readily accessible for a given patient; to identify unusual or aberrant patterns of prescribing, dispensing, or receiving controlled substances; and to generate an automatic alert when such patterns arise to automate standard reports and to provide ad hoc reports on a real-time basis on this data as well as other data feeds. These reports shall comply with the patient confidentiality requirements of federal and state law;

Developing regulations to ensure that prescription-drug-monitoring analyses are updated and disseminated regularly to appropriate officials and that summary reports are provided to the general assembly on or before February 1 of each year. Given the intent to decrease the number of Rhode Island citizens affected by opioid use, the department shall provide an interim report on the status of the directives included herein and any progress made as of October 1, 2016. In the development of the regulations, the department may include any of the following analytical functions, within the boundaries of patient confidentiality rights under state and federal law:

Consolidate raw prescription data collected from dispensing pharmacists into a single view of all prescriptions filled for a given patient;

Identify unusual or aberrant patterns of prescribing controlled substances, by relevant prescriber attributes, and generate an automatic alert when these patterns arise;

Identify unusual or aberrant patterns of receiving prescriptions for controlled substances, by relevant patient attributes, and generate an automatic alert when these patterns arise;

Identify unusual or aberrant patterns of dispensing controlled substances, by relevant dispenser attributes, and generate an automatic alert when these patterns arise;

Identify and visually display linkages among prescribers, patients, and dispensers that can be used to detect any collusive behaviors; and

The department shall apply for federal funding in support of the goals and objectives contained in this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 124, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 132, § 2; P.L. 2014, ch. 48, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 180, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 200, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 464, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 263, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 90, § 1, effective June 25, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 91, § 1, effective June 25, 2021.

21-28-3.33.
Voluntary non-opiate directive form.

The department shall establish a voluntary non-opiate directive form. The form shall indicate to all practitioners that an individual shall not be administered or offered a prescription or medication order for an opiate. The form shall be posted on the department’s searchable website. An individual may execute and file a voluntary non-opiate directive form with a practitioner licensed under chapter 37 of title 5 or other authority authorized by the director to accept the voluntary non-opiate directive form for filing. An individual may revoke the voluntary non-opiate directive form for any reason and may do so by written or oral means.

The department shall promulgate regulations for the implementation of the voluntary non-opiate directive form that shall include, but not be limited to:

The procedures to record the voluntary non-opiate directive form in the individual’s electronic health record and in the prescription drug monitoring program established pursuant to §

21-28-3.18

;

A standard form for the recording and transmission of the voluntary non-opiate directive form that shall include verification by a practitioner registered under chapter 37 of title 5 and that shall comply with the written consent requirements of the Public Health Service Act, 42 U.S.C. § 290dd-2(b), and 42 C.F.R. Part 2; provided, however, that the voluntary non-opiate directive form shall also provide the basic procedures necessary to revoke the voluntary non-opiate directive form;

The requirements for an individual to appoint a duly authorized guardian or healthcare proxy to override a previously recorded voluntary non-opiate directive form;

The procedures to ensure that any recording, sharing, or distribution of data relative to the voluntary non-opiate directive form complies with all state and federal confidentiality laws; and

Appropriate exemptions for pre-hospital emergency medical services providers and other medical personnel.

A written prescription that is presented at an outpatient pharmacy or a prescription that is electronically transmitted to an outpatient pharmacy shall be presumed to be valid for the purposes of this section and a pharmacist in an outpatient setting shall not be held in violation of this section for dispensing a controlled substance in contradiction to a voluntary non-opiate directive form, except upon evidence that the pharmacist acted knowingly against the voluntary non-opiate directive form.

No healthcare provider or employee of a healthcare provider acting in good faith shall be subject to criminal or civil liability or be considered to have engaged in unprofessional conduct for failing to offer or administer a prescription or medication order for an opiate under the voluntary non-opiate directive form.

No person acting as an agent pursuant to a healthcare proxy shall be subject to criminal or civil liability for making a decision under subsection (b)(3) of this section in good faith.

The board of medical licensure and discipline may limit, condition, or suspend the license of or assess fines against a licensed healthcare provider who recklessly or negligently fails to comply with a person’s voluntary non-opiate directive form.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 252, § 1.